Idaho statutes. Title 16 JUVENILE PROCEEDINGS
Chapter 16 CHILD PROTECTIVE ACT
§ 16-1632. Guardian ad litem coordinator — Duties — Annual report.

Under rules, policies and procedures adopted by the Idaho supreme court which may include, but are not limited to, provisions establishing fiscal controls and requiring compliance with all or part of the standards adopted by the national court appointed special advocate association, the persons or entities receiving moneys from the grant administrator to coordinate a guardian ad litem program in a judicial district may be required by the terms of the grant to perform any or all of the following duties:

To establish, maintain and coordinate a districtwide guardian ad litem program consistent with the provisions of this chapter;

To furnish the necessary administrative and staffing services as may from time to time be required;

To act as a coordinator for the purpose of providing guardians ad litem for children brought within the purview of this chapter;

To seek to have each child brought within the purview of this chapter available to him a guardian ad litem throughout each stage of any child protective proceeding;

To establish a program for attorneys to represent guardians ad litem, whether or not appointed by the court in conjunction with the local, districtwide, and state bar associations;

To the extent possible to establish a districtwide program to recruit volunteer guardians ad litem sufficient to provide services in each county of the judicial district;

In conjunction with the department, prosecuting attorneys and city and county law enforcement officials, mental health professionals, social workers, school counselors and the medical community, the coordinators may assist in the development and implementation of a statewide uniform protocol for the investigation of allegations of abuse, neglect or abandonment pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

To develop uniform criteria to screen, select, train and remove guardians ad litem;

To establish a priority list of those proceedings under this chapter in which a guardian ad litem shall be appointed in districts where there are insufficient numbers of guardians ad litem.

Each guardian ad litem coordinator shall submit an annual report for the preceding fiscal year to the grant administrator for delivery to the legislature no later than ten (10) days following the start of each regular session. Such report shall contain the number and type of proceedings filed in the district under this chapter, the number of children subject to proceedings in the district under this chapter and the number of appointed guardians ad litem, the nature of services the guardians ad litem provided, the number of guardians ad litem trained in each district, the number of hours of service provided by guardians ad litem and attorneys and a complete financial statement for the past year and financial support requirements for the next fiscal year.

§ 16-1633. Guardian ad litem — Duties.

Subject to the direction of the court, the guardian ad litem shall advocate for the best interests of the child and shall have the following duties which shall continue until resignation of the guardian ad litem or until the court removes the guardian ad litem or no longer has jurisdiction, whichever first occurs:

To conduct an independent factual investigation of the circumstances of the child including, without limitation, the circumstances described in the petition.

To file with the court prior to any adjudicatory, review or permanency hearing a written report stating the results of the investigation, the guardian ad litem’s recommendations and such other information as the court may require. In all post-adjudicatory reports, the guardian ad litem shall inquire of any child capable of expressing his or her wishes regarding permanency and, when applicable, the transition from foster care to independent living and shall include the child’s express wishes in the report to the court. The guardian ad litem’s written report shall be delivered to the court, with copies to all parties to the case at least five (5) days before the date set for the hearing. The report submitted prior to the adjudicatory hearing shall not be admitted into evidence at the hearing and shall be used by the court only for disposition if the child is found to be within the purview of the act.

To act as an advocate for the child for whom appointed at each stage of proceedings under this chapter. To that end, the guardian ad litem shall participate fully in the proceedings and to the degree necessary to adequately advocate for the child’s best interests, and shall be entitled to confer with the child, the child’s siblings, the child’s parents and any other individual or entity having information relevant to the child protection case.

To monitor the circumstances of a child and to assure that the terms of the court’s orders are being fulfilled and remain in the best interest of the child.

To maintain all information regarding the case confidential and to not disclose the same except to the court or to other parties to the case.

Such other and further duties as may be expressly imposed by the court order.

§ 16-1634. Guardian ad litem — Rights and powers.

The guardian ad litem will have the following rights and powers, which shall continue until resignation of the guardian ad litem or until the court removes the guardian ad litem or no longer has jurisdiction, whichever first occurs:

The guardian ad litem, if represented by counsel, may file pleadings, motions, memoranda and briefs on behalf of the child, and shall have all of the rights of a party whether conferred by statute, rule of court or otherwise.

All parties to any proceeding under this chapter shall promptly notify the guardian ad litem and the guardian’s attorney of all hearings, staffings, investigations, depositions and significant changes of circumstances of the child.

Except to the extent prohibited or regulated by federal law or by the provisions of chapter 82, title 39, Idaho Code, upon presentation of a copy of the order appointing guardian ad litem, any person or agency, including, without limitation, any hospital, school, organization, department of health and welfare, doctor, nurse, or other health care provider, psychologist, psychiatrist, police department or mental health clinic shall permit the guardian ad litem to inspect and copy pertinent records necessary for the proceeding for which the guardian is appointed relating to the child and parent without consent of the child or parents.

§ 16-1635. Immunity from liability.

Any person appointed as a guardian ad litem, the coordinator, or a guardian ad litem volunteer program employee shall be personally immune from any liability for acts, omissions or errors in the same manner as if such person were a volunteer officer or director under the provisions of section 6-1605, Idaho Code.

§ 16-1636. Compliance with federal law.

For the purposes of the child abuse prevention and treatment act, 42 U.S.C. sections 5101 et seq., grant [grants] to this state under public law no. 93-247, or any related state or federal legislation, a guardian ad litem or other person appointed pursuant to section 16-1614, Idaho Code, shall be deemed a guardian ad litem to represent the interests of the minor in proceedings before the court. Any provisions of this chapter which shall cause this state to lose federal funding shall be considered null and void.

§ 16-1637. Exemption.

Any person appointed as a guardian ad litem by court order shall be exempt from the provisions of chapter 32, title 54, Idaho Code.

§ 16-1638. Guardian ad litem account — Creation.

There is hereby created an account in the agency asset fund in the state treasury to be designated the guardian ad litem account.

The account shall consist of:

Moneys appropriated to the account;

Donations, gifts and grants to the account from any source; and

Any other moneys which may hereafter be provided by law.

Moneys in the account may be expended for the purposes provided in sections 16-1632 through 16-1638, Idaho Code. Interest earned on the investment of idle money in the guardian ad litem account shall be returned to the guardian ad litem account.

Disbursements of moneys from the account shall be by appropriation from the legislature to the supreme court, which moneys shall be used for the payment of grants to qualified recipients and for expenses incurred for carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

§ 16-1639. Guardian ad litem grants.

The grant administrator is hereby authorized and directed to award and administer grants from the money which shall be from time to time available to the grant administrator from the guardian ad litem account. The foregoing power and authorization shall be subject to requirements imposed by the supreme court and the following provisions:

Grants may be made available to any person, organization, corporation, or agency for any of the following purposes:

To enable such entity to act as the guardian ad litem coordinator in any judicial district.

To enable such entity to recruit, organize and administer a panel of guardians ad litem and volunteer lawyers to represent guardians ad litem.

To enable such entity to recruit, organize, train and support persons or entities to act as guardian ad litem coordinators in judicial districts which do not yet have guardian ad litem coordinators.

To enable such entity to pay the administrative and other miscellaneous expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of the guardian ad litem program.

The grant administrator shall endeavor in allocating available funds to foster the development and operation of a guardian ad litem program in each judicial district in the state; provided, however, the grant administrator shall have no obligation to seek out or organize guardian ad litem coordinators or persons willing to act as such in judicial districts lacking a guardian ad litem coordinator.

Funds available to the grant administrator from the guardian ad litem account may be also used to pay the grant administrator’s cost of performing its duties and obligations pursuant to this chapter.

§ 16-1640. Administrative Procedure Act.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to alter the requirements provided in chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

§ 16-1641. Construction.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to accomplish the purposes herein set forth.

§ 16-1642. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and cited as the “Child Protective Act.”

§ 16-1643. Severability.

The provisions of this chapter are hereby declared to be severable and if any provision of this chapter or the application of such provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason, such declaration shall not affect the validity of remaining portions of this chapter.

§ 16-1644. Limitations on caregiver liability.

For purposes of this section:

“Age or developmentally appropriate” means:

Activities that are generally accepted as suitable for children of the same chronological age or level of maturity or that are determined to be developmentally appropriate for a child, based on the development of cognitive, emotional, physical and behavioral capacities that are typical for an age or age group; and

In the case of a specific child, activities or items that are suitable for the child based on the developmental stages attained by the child with respect to the cognitive, emotional, physical and behavioral capacities of the child.

“Reasonable and prudent parent standard” means the standard of care characterized by careful and sensible parental decisions that maintain the health, safety and best interest of a child while simultaneously encouraging the emotional and developmental growth of the child when determining whether to allow a child in foster care under the responsibility of the state to participate in extracurricular, enrichment, cultural or social activities.

A caregiver shall use the reasonable and prudent parent standard in determining whether to permit a child to participate in an activity while in foster care. A caregiver shall also consider whether the activity is age or developmentally appropriate.

A caregiver shall not be liable for harm caused to a child in an out-of-home placement if the child participates in an activity approved by the caregiver when the caregiver has acted in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.

This section does not remove or limit any existing liability protection otherwise provided by law.

§ 16-1645. Exemption.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, nothing in this chapter modifies or supersedes the requirements of the Indian child welfare act of 1978, 25 U.S.C. 1901, et seq.

§ 16-1646. State department of health and welfare annual report.

The state department of health and welfare shall submit an annual report regarding the foster care program to the germane standing committees of the legislature no later than ten (10) days following the start of each regular session. On or before February 15 of each year, the state department of health and welfare shall appear before the germane standing committees to present the report. Such report shall include, but need not be limited to, the number of children that are in the department’s legal custody pursuant to this chapter, the number of such children who have been placed in foster care, how many times such children have been moved to different foster care homes and the reasons for such moves, best practices in foster care, goals to improve the foster care system in Idaho to ensure best practices are adhered to, a description of progress made with regard to the previous year’s goals to improve the foster care system and any other information relating to foster care that the legislature requests. If a member of the legislature requests additional information between the time the report is received by the legislature and the time the department appears to present the report, then the department shall supplement its report to include such additional information.

§ 16-1647. Citizen review panels — Child protection legislative review panel.

Each public health district, as set forth in section 39-408, Idaho Code, shall establish a citizen review panel for the purposes of evaluating and providing recommendations for the improvement of the child protection system within its respective health district.

Each citizen review panel shall be comprised of up to seven (7) members. Members shall reside within the boundaries of the public health district.

The public health districts shall develop an application and process for selecting citizen review panel members. The public health districts shall be responsible for convening the meetings of the citizen review panels and providing administrative support to coordinate meeting times and reports. Panel members shall be volunteers broadly representative of the community in which the panel is established and include members who have expertise in the prevention and treatment of child abuse and neglect and may include adult former victims of child abuse or neglect. An effort shall be made to create a panel comprised of members from diverse professional backgrounds who demonstrate a strong motivation to improve the lives of children. Panel members must pass a criminal background check.

Each citizen review panel shall review all cases brought under the child protective act that have been open in the corresponding district court, or other appropriate local jurisdiction, longer than one hundred twenty (120) days.

Citizen review panel members shall be granted access to copies of all records in the department’s custody related to the child and case under review including all information pertaining to prior referrals, prior safety assessments, all court filings and any police reports. The department shall give citizen review panel members access to copies of any additional records within the department’s custody upon request. The department shall develop a memorandum of understanding addressing delivery, maintenance and destruction of all records, which must be signed by the panel member before accessing department records.

Representative members from each of the seven (7) citizen review panels shall meet at least quarterly to discuss trends and concerns arising in different areas of the state. Meetings may take place telephonically, electronically or in person.

Each citizen review panel shall produce a quarterly report containing a summary of the activities of the panel and offering recommendations to improve the child protection system experience for children. Reports shall be provided to the department and presented to the child protection legislative review panel established in subsection (9) of this section during its next meeting. Reports shall be exempt from public disclosure in the same manner as are records of investigations prepared by the department pursuant to section 74-105(7), Idaho Code.

The department shall submit an annual written response to citizen review panel reports. This response shall be made available to the public and presented to the child protection legislative review panel established in subsection (9) of this section.